Maryland, session 2026, HB1277.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
SUBTITLE 14. MARYLAND INSTITUTE FOR LITERACY AND EQUITY.
24–1401.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “INSTITUTE” MEANS THE MARYLAND INSTITUTE FOR LITERACY AND
EQUITY.
(C) “UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
12–101 OF THIS ARTICLE.
24–1402.
(A) THERE IS A MARYLAND INSTITUTE FOR LITERACY AND EQUITY
ORGANIZED AS A PARTNERSHIP BETWEEN THE UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND,
COLLEGE PARK CAMPUS AND MORGAN STATE UNIVERSITY TO SERVE AS A
STATE–FUNDED RESEARCH AND TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE CENTER TO PROMOTE
LITERACY IN THE STATE.
(B) THE INSTITUTE SHALL:
(1) SUPPORT THE MISSION AND PRIORITIES OF THE DEPARTMENT
AND COUNTY BOARDS BY PROVIDING TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE AND BY
COORDINATING ACCESS TO PROGRAMS AND RESOURCES NEEDED BY THESE
ENTITIES AND THE COMMUNITIES THEY SERVE TO ENHANCE AND EXPAND THE
IMPLEMENTATION OF EFFECTIVE LITERACY INSTRUCTION AND INTERVENTION;

HOUSE BILL 1277 3
(2) CONDUCT CUTTING–EDGE RESEARCH ON LANGUAGE AND
LITERACY TO DEVELOP INNOVATIVE, EVIDENCE–BASED PRACTICES IN LITERACY
THAT INCREASE LITERACY ACHIEVEMENT AND OPPORTUNITY FOR ALL CHILDREN
AND ADULTS IN THE STATE;
(3) PROVIDE EDUCATIONAL OPPORTUNITIES FOR UNDERGRADUATE
AND GRADUATE STUDENTS AT THE RESPECTIVE PARTNER INSTITUTIONS ON
EVIDENCE–BASED LITERACY PRACTICES THAT ARE RESPONSIVE TO THE NEEDS OF
A DIVERSE POPULATION; AND
(4) ENGAGE WITH COMMUNITY ORGANIZATIONS AND
OUT–OF–SCHOOL LEARNING ENVIRONMENTS, INCLUDING LIBRARIES AND
AFTER–SCHOOL PROGRAMS, TO PROVIDE AWARENESS AROUND EVIDENCE–BASED
LITERACY PRACTICES THAT ARE RELEVANT TO THE STUDENTS SERVED.
24–1403.
(A) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2028, THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE
ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF $1,500,000 TO THE UNIVERSITY OF
MARYLAND, COLLEGE PARK CAMPUS AND $1,500,000 TO MORGAN STATE
UNIVERSITY TO ESTABLISH THE INSTITUTE.
(B) (1) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2029, THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE
ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF $4,000,000 TO THE INSTITUTE.
(2) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2030, THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE
ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION OF $5,000,000 TO THE INSTITUTE.
(3) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2031 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER,
THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION
OF $6,000,000 TO THE INSTITUTE.
(C) THE APPROPRIATIONS TO THE INSTITUTE UNDER SUBSECTIONS (A)
AND (B) OF THIS SECTION SHALL BE USED TO:
(1) EXPAND CAPACITY TO PROVIDE TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE TO THE
DEPARTMENT AND COUNTY BOARDS AND THE COMMUNITIES THEY SERVE ON THE
IMPLEMENTATION OF EFFECTIVE LITERACY INSTRUCTION AND INTERVENTION;
(2) ENHANCE RESEARCH CAPACITY THROUGH PARTNERSHIPS WITH
SCHOOLS AND COMMUNITIES TO FURTHER DEVELOP INNOVATIVE PRACTICES IN
LITERACY THAT INCREASE LITERACY ACHIEVEMENT AND OPPORTUNITY FOR ALL
CHILDREN AND ADULTS IN THE STATE;

HOUSE BILL 1277
(3) PROVIDE PROGRAMS, TRAINING OPPORTUNITIES, AND
RESOURCES FOR THE STATE’S LITERACY PROFESSIONALS ON THE BEST
EVIDENCE–BASED LITERACY PRACTICES THAT SUPPORT LEARNERS FROM ALL
CULTURES, COMMUNITIES, LANGUAGES, AND OF ALL ABILITIES, INCLUDING TO:
(I) EDUCATORS;
(II) ADMINISTRATORS;
(III) LIBRARIANS AND MEDIA SPECIALISTS;
(IV) SPEECH–LANGUAGE PATHOLOGISTS; AND
(V) SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGISTS;
(4) FACILITATE PARTNERSHIPS AMONG EDUCATORS, RESEARCHERS,
COMMUNITY LEADERS, AND POLICYMAKERS TO FOSTER GREATER KNOWLEDGE AND
UNDERSTANDING OF POLICIES AND PRACTICES AROUND LITERACY;
(5) ASSIST THE DEPARTMENT, COUNTY BOARDS, AND SCHOOL
LEADERS TO ANALYZE AND INTERPRET DATA TO:
(I) INFORM DECISION MAKING;
(II) DEVELOP ACTION PLANS; AND
(III) IMPROVE LITERACY OUTCOMES;
(6) PROVIDE INSIGHT INTO THE IMPACT OF POLICIES IN THE
PROMOTION AND ACHIEVEMENT OF LITERACY INCLUDING THROUGH WORK WITH
LOCAL, STATE, AND NATIONAL ORGANIZATIONS; AND
(7) PROMOTE LITERACY AWARENESS AND INVOLVEMENT WITH THE
BROADER COMMUNITY IN THE STATE INCLUDING THROUGH OUTREACH PROGRAMS,
FAMILY LITERACY INITIATIVES, AND PARTNERSHIPS WITH LOCAL ORGANIZATIONS.
24–1404.
ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2027, AND EACH OCTOBER 1 THEREAFTER, THE
INSTITUTE SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT DETAILING THE INSTITUTE’S ACTIVITIES,
OUTCOMES, AND FINANCIAL EXPENDITURES FOR THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING
FISCAL YEAR TO THE UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND AND THE DEPARTMENT.

HOUSE BILL 1277 5
24–1405.
THIS SUBTITLE MAY BE CITED AS THE MARYLAND INSTITUTE FOR LITERACY
AND EQUITY ACT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.